Rhode Island statutes. Title 30 Military Affairs and Defense
Chapter 24 Rhode Island Veterans’ Home

30-24-1.
Management and control.

The management and control of the Rhode Island veterans’ home, established in this state for those who served in the army, navy, marine corps, coast guard, merchant marines, or air force of the United States in any war or conflict and were honorably discharged therefrom, who shall be in need of such care as is provided at the home, shall be the responsibility of the director of human services, or his or her designee.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 88, § 1; P.L. 1901, ch. 809, § 19; G.L. 1909, ch. 104, § 1; P.L. 1914, ch. 1045, § 1; P.L. 1918, ch. 1633, § 1; P.L. 1919, ch. 1752, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 116, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 654, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 80; impl. am. P.L. 1949, ch. 2166, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2724, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

30-24-1

; P.L. 1976, ch. 102, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 164, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 233, § 3; P.L. 2009, ch. 234, § 3; P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 9, § 5.

30-24-2.
Bylaws and regulations — Supervision by director.

The director of human services, or his or her designee, shall have the general supervision over, and shall prescribe rules for, the government and management of the Rhode Island veterans’ home. He or she shall make all needful bylaws and regulations governing the admission, maintenance, and discharge of the residents of the home, which shall not be inconsistent with the spirit and intent of this chapter, and generally may do all things necessary to successfully carry into effect the purposes of this chapter.

The director shall appoint and employ all subordinate officials and persons needed for the proper management of the home.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 88, §§ 3, 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 104, §§ 3, 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 116, §§ 3, 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 654, §§ 3, 4; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2724, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

30-24-2

; P.L. 1976, ch. 102, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 164, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 233, § 3; P.L. 2009, ch. 234, § 3; P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 9, § 5; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 46.

30-24-3.
Administrator — Advisory council.

The director of veterans services shall appoint an administrator for the Rhode Island veterans’ home who shall be an honorably discharged veteran of the United States Armed Forces.

There shall be an advisory council for veterans’ affairs, consisting of not more than fifteen (15) qualified electors of this state, ten (10) of whom shall be honorably discharged veterans of the armed forces of the United States; twelve (12) of the members shall be appointed by the governor, consisting of a member designated by each of the various state departments of the active federally chartered veteran organizations, and the remaining member or members at large; provided, however, that each of those departments of veteran organizations shall have, and continue to have, at least one member on the advisory council for veterans’ affairs; and, provided further, that one member shall be a female veteran, one member shall be a minority veteran; one member of the house of representatives, to be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives, and one member from the senate, to be appointed by the president of the senate. The members of the general assembly who shall serve on the advisory council for veterans’ affairs shall serve so long as they are members of the general assembly. The final remaining member shall be an active National Guard person to be appointed by the state adjutant general.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 89; P.L. 1951, ch. 2696, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

30-24-3

; P.L. 1976, ch. 102, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 70, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 429, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 333, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 62; P.L. 2001, ch. 361, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 233, § 3; P.L. 2009, ch. 234, § 3; P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 9, § 5; P.L. 2017, ch. 123, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 153, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 43, § 1, effective June 14, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 44, § 1, effective June 11, 2021.

30-24-4.
Appointments to advisory council — Organization and meetings.

Annually, on or before July 1, the governor shall appoint a successor of each member of the advisory council whose term expires, these appointments to be for a term of three (3) years. In case of any vacancy or additional members on the council, the governor shall appoint a new member for the unexpired portion of the term of that membership as hereinbefore provided. Members of the council shall serve without pay. The advisory council shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson for a period of one year and until a successor is elected and qualified. Meetings shall be held at the call of the chairperson; provided, however, that a majority of the members may call a meeting of the advisory council at any time, all members being notified in any case by mail and reasonably in advance of any such meetings. A majority of members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. The governor may remove a member of the council for neglect of duty. Administrative support for the council shall be provided by the director of veterans services.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 89; P.L. 1951, ch. 2696, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

30-24-4

; P.L. 1976, ch. 102, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 429, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 233, § 3; P.L. 2009, ch. 234, § 3; P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 9, § 5; P.L. 2017, ch. 123, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 153, § 1.

30-24-5.
Functions of advisory council.

The advisory council for veterans’ affairs shall exercise and perform all the duties and functions formerly exercised and performed by the advisory council for the Rhode Island veterans’ home. The advisory council for the Rhode Island veterans’ home is hereby abolished. The advisory council for veterans’ affairs shall make suggestions to and shall advise the director of the office of veterans services; provided, however, that the advisory council shall have no administrative power.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 89; P.L. 1951, ch. 2696, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

30-24-5

; P.L. 1976, ch. 102, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 233, § 3; P.L. 2009, ch. 234, § 3; P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 9, § 5; P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 4, § 17; P.L. 2017, ch. 123, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 153, § 1.

30-24-6.
Acceptance of gifts — Veterans’ home restricted account.

The director of human services is hereby authorized and empowered to take and receive in the name of the state any grant, devise, gift, or bequest of real or personal property that may be made for the use and benefit of the Rhode Island veterans’ home or the residents or purposes thereof. All money so received, and all money received under the provisions of §§

30-24-9

and

30-24-10

, shall be paid over to the general treasurer and shall be kept by him or her as a restricted account to be known as the “veterans’ home restricted account”. Use of the “veterans’ home restricted account” funds may only be made upon prior approval of the house of representatives’ finance committee and senate finance committee. The director may sell and dispose of any real or personal property received under this section, and any property received under §

30-24-9

, and the proceeds of the sale shall be paid over to the general treasurer to be made a part of the restricted account. The restricted account shall be used for the improvement of social, recreational, and educational programs, including the purchase of educational and recreational supplies and equipment for the welfare of members and for operational expenses and capital improvements at the veterans’ home and veterans’ cemetery, as deemed necessary by the director of human services.

[Deleted by P.L. 1999, ch. 11, section 5 .]

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, there is hereby established a restricted receipt account within the general fund of the state for the sole purpose of the collection and disbursement of any grant, devise, gift, or bequest of real or personal property that may be made for the use and benefit of the design, construction, and furnishing of a new Rhode Island veterans home in Bristol. This account shall be known as “donations — new veterans’ home construction”.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 88, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 104, § 2; P.L. 1921, ch. 2035, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 116, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 654, § 2; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, §§ 65, 80; impl. am. P.L. 1949, ch. 2166, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

30-24-6

; P.L. 1976, ch. 102, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 164, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 392, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 129, art. 9, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 6, art. 15, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 21, § 2; P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 9, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 40, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 11, § 5; P.L. 2004, ch. 583, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 591, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 233, § 3; P.L. 2009, ch. 234, § 3; P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 9, § 5; P.L. 2014, ch. 145, art. 3, § 2.

30-24-7.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 88, § 15; G.L. 1909, ch. 104, § 18; G.L. 1923, ch. 116, § 18; G.L. 1938, ch. 654, § 13; impl. am. P.L. 1949, ch. 2166, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

30-24-7

; Repealed by P.L. 1976, ch. 102, § 2.

30-24-8.
Funds remaining at end of year.

The unexpended balance of such sum or sums of money as are received and appropriated as provided in §

30-24-6

for the veterans’ home restricted account remaining in the treasury at the close of each fiscal year, shall be continued to, and is hereby annually appropriated for, the same account for the ensuing year.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 88, § 16; G.L. 1909, ch. 104, § 17; G.L. 1923, ch. 116, § 17; G.L. 1938, ch. 654, § 14; impl. am. P.L. 1949, ch. 2166, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

30-24-8

; P.L. 1976, ch. 102, § 1.

30-24-9.
Property of deceased residents.

All goods, chattels, property, money, and effects of a deceased resident of the Rhode Island veterans’ home that have not been disposed of by him or her by a completed inter vivos conveyance or gift, or by a valid will, after payment therefrom of the funeral expenses, which shall not exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000), and after payment therefrom of the reasonable debts and expenses of the deceased resident to be determined by rules and regulations as shall be adopted by the director, shall upon his or her decease become the property of the state, and shall be applied by the director of human services, or his or her designee, to the uses and purposes of the veterans’ restricted account; provided, however, that the director may, in his or her discretion, deliver to any surviving relative of the deceased resident any of the property or effects as may serve as a memento of the deceased resident. For purposes of this section, the provisions of chapter 24 of title 33 shall be applicable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1896, ch. 305, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 104, § 21; G.L. 1923, ch. 116, § 21; G.L. 1938, ch. 654, § 18; impl. am. P.L. 1949, ch. 2166, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2724, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

30-24-9

; P.L. 1973, ch. 131, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 102, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 86, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 164, §§ 2, 3; P.L. 1986, ch. 381, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 312, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 233, § 3; P.L. 2009, ch. 234, § 3; P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 9, § 5; P.L. 2015, ch. 220, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 238, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 46.

30-24-10.
Admissible to home — Fees.

Any person who has served in the army, navy, marine corps, coast guard, or air force of the United States for a period of ninety (90) days or more and that period began or ended during any foreign war in which the United States shall have been engaged or in any expedition or campaign for which the United States government issues a campaign medal, and who was honorably discharged from it, and who shall be deemed to be in need of care provided at the Rhode Island veterans’ home, may be admitted to that facility subject to such rules and regulations as shall be adopted by the director of human services to govern the admission of applicants to the facility. Any person who has served in the armed forces of the United States designated herein and otherwise qualified, who has served less than the ninety-day (90) period described in this section, and who was honorably discharged from service, and who, as a result of the service, acquired a service-connected disability or disease, may be admitted. No person shall be admitted to the facility unless the person has been accredited to the enlistment or induction quota of the state or has resided in the state for at least two (2) consecutive years next prior to the date of the application for admission to the facility.

The director shall, at the end of each fiscal year, determine the net, per-diem expenses of maintenance of residents in the facility and shall assess against each resident who has “net income”, as defined in this section, a fee equal to eighty percent (80%) of the resident’s net income, provided that fee shall not exceed the actual cost of care and maintenance for the resident; and provided that an amount equal to twenty percent (20%) of the maintenance fee assessed shall be allocated to, and deposited in, the veterans’ restricted account. For the purposes of this section, “net income” is defined as gross income minus applicable federal and state taxes and minus:

An amount equal to one hundred fifty dollars ($150) per month of residency and fifty percent (50%) of any sum received due to wounds incurred under battle conditions for which the resident received the purple heart; and

The amount paid by a resident for the support and maintenance of his or her spouse, parent(s), minor child(ren), or child(ren) who is/are blind or permanently and totally disabled as defined in title XVI of the Federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. §§ 1381 — 1383d, subject to a maximum amount to be determined by rules and regulations as shall be adopted by the director.

The fees shall be paid monthly to the home and any failure to make payment when due shall be cause for dismissal from the facility. Prior to dismissal, the resident shall be afforded administrative due process.

Admissions to the veterans’ home shall be made without discrimination as to race, color, national origin, religion, sex, disability, marital status, age, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, assets, or income.

Laundry services shall be provided to the residents of the Rhode Island veterans’ home at no charge to the residents, with such funds to cover the cost of providing laundry services for residents of the Rhode Island veterans’ home derived from monies appropriated to the department of human services.

History of Section.

G.L., ch. 104, § 22; P.L. 1919, ch. 1751, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 116, § 22; P.L. 1933, ch. 2025, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 654, § 19; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 60, § 80; impl. am. P.L. 1949, ch. 2166, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

30-24-10

; P.L. 1968, ch. 23, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 102, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 164, §§ 2, 3; P.L. 1991, ch. 6, art. 15, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 67; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 67; P.L. 2002, ch. 65, art. 13, § 30; P.L. 2002, ch. 352, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 376, art. 44, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 595, art. 40, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 282, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 301, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 233, § 3; P.L. 2009, ch. 234, § 3; P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 9, § 5.

30-24-10.1.
Domiciliary care program for homeless veterans.

The director of the department of human services is hereby authorized and empowered to establish and maintain a domiciliary care program for homeless veterans (veterans transitional supportive program, V.T.S.P.) at the Rhode Island veterans’ home. Any veteran admitted to the Rhode Island veterans’ home pursuant to this section shall be exempt from the maintenance fee assessment established pursuant to §

30-24-10

; provided, however, that the director shall assess against each veteran admitted under this program a monthly maintenance fee equal to ten percent (10%) of the veteran’s monthly gross income, from whatever source derived and whether taxable or non-taxable. In addition there will also be additional beds called extended, V.T.S.P. beds to which a monthly maintenance fee of thirty percent (30%) will be charged. Extended V.T.S.P. will be available to eligible veterans in the V.T.S.P. program, but occupancy will not exceed four (4) months. The maintenance fee shall be paid monthly to the veterans’ home and shall be deposited in the veterans’ home fund. Any failure to make payment when due shall be cause for dismissal from the facility. Prior to any dismissal for non-payment of fees, the veteran shall be afforded administrative due process. The director is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the intent and provisions of this section, and this grant of authority to promulgate rules and regulations shall be liberally construed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 75, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 289, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 233, § 3; P.L. 2009, ch. 234, § 3; P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 9, § 5.

30-24-11.
Severability.

If any clause, sentence, paragraph, section, or part of this chapter is adjudged by any court of competent jurisdiction to be invalid, that judgment will not affect, impair, or invalidate the remainder thereof, but will be confined in its operation to the clause, sentence, paragraph, section, or part directly involved in the controversy in which the judgment has been rendered.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 164, § 3.